Utah, session 2026, SB281.
Section 1. Section 26B-6-115 is enacted to read:26B-6-115. Senior nutrition private donation incentives.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Area need" means the food and nutrition needs of seniors in a geographical area served by a local area agency, as determined by:(i)the total number of seniors receiving and on the waiting list for home delivered meals; and(ii)the percentage of individuals described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) compared to the total population.(b)"Fund" means the Senior Nutrition Private Donation Matching Fund.(2)(a)There is created the Senior Nutrition Private Donation Matching Fund.(b)The fund shall consist of:(i)appropriations from the Legislature;(ii)private donations; and(iii)interest earned on money in the account.(c)Distributions from the fund shall be used:(i)to match private donations that a local area agency fundraises; and(ii)to support home delivered meals for seniors.(d)The fund may not include any donations or appropriations made before July 1, 2025.(3)(a)The division may distribute funds, in accordance with Subsection (4), to a local area agency if the agency fundraises a private donation that:(i)is separate from funds used for matching as described in Section 26B-6-108;(ii)is not an in kind donation; and(iii)is not donated by a recipient of agency services.(b)(i)A private donation may include a donation from a public entity if the donation is:(A)received after December 31, 2025; and(B)is more than the public entity donated in the previous fiscal year.(ii)Only the amount of the increase described in Subsection (3)(b)(i)(B) is eligible for matching.(4)(a)The division shall develop a formula to distribute money in the fund.(b)The formula described in Subsection (4)(a) shall:(i)be based on the area need; and(ii)account for:(A)the existing state formula;(B)the higher costs of providing service in a rural area; and(C)reduced capacity for fundraising in a rural area.(c)The division shall report the formula developed in accordance with this Subsection (4) to the Social Services Appropriations Subcommittee.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.